Massachusetts, session 194th, H418.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 32A of chapter 13 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:-
Dispute hearings before the board of state examiners of electricians and the board of
electricians’ appeals shall be open to the public. The boards shall permit a member of the public
for whom the electrician in the dispute has conducted electrical work to submit a written
affidavit or testimonial about the electrician’s work.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of chapter 141 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by inserting before the definition of “Fee” the following definition:-
"Faulty work", any electrical work that fails to meet the applicable standards of the most
recently published NFPA 70, National Electrical Code (NEC), state regulations or other industry
standards, including work that is incomplete, defective, improperly installed or unsafe.
of 2

SECTION 3. Said chapter 141 is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 11. If an electrician fails to perform electrical work in accordance with the
standards described in this chapter, the electrician shall repay any deposit paid by the client for
the electrical work.
In cases where the board of electricians’ appeals determines an electrician’s work was
faulty work, the electrician shall reimburse the client the full deposit or any other advanced
payment within 30 days of the determination.
of 2